Colorado statutes. TITLE 32 Special Districts
PART 6
SPECIAL ASSESSMENTS

32-11-601. Special assessments.

The board, pursuant to this part 6 and to sections 32-11-803 to 32-11-808, upon the behalf and in the name of the urban district, for the purpose of defraying all the cost of acquiring or improving or acquiring and improving any project authorized by this article, or any portion of the cost thereof not to be defrayed with moneys available therefor from the general fund, any special fund, or otherwise, also has power under this article:

To levy assessments against assessable property within the urban district and to cause the assessments so levied to be collected;

To pledge the proceeds of any assessments levied under this article to the payment of assessment bonds and of assessment debentures and to create liens on such proceeds to secure such payments;

To issue assessment bonds and assessment debentures payable from the assessments and additionally to secure their payment as provided in this article;

To make all contracts, to execute all instruments, and to do all things necessary or convenient in the exercise of the powers granted in this article or in the performance of the district's duties or in order to secure the payment of its assessment bonds and assessment debentures, subject to the provisions of sections 32-11-502 to 32-11-526 and 32-11-803 to 32-11-808.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 785, § 114.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-114.

32-11-602. Initiating procedure.

The procedure for acquiring or improving, or acquiring and improving, any assessment project can be initiated in one of the following ways:

The provisional order method; or

The petition method.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 785, § 115.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-115.

32-11-603. Provisional order method.

Whenever the board is of the opinion that the interest of the urban district requires any assessment project, the board, by resolution, shall direct the engineer to prepare:

Preliminary plans showing:

A typical section of the contemplated project; and

The types of material, approximate thickness, and width;

A preliminary estimate of the cost of the project, including incidental costs; and

An assessment plat showing:

The area to be assessed; and

The amount of maximum benefits estimated to be assessed against each tract in each assessment area.

The resolution may provide for one or more types of construction, and the engineer shall separately estimate the cost of each type of construction. The estimate may be made in a lump sum or by unit process, as to such engineer may seem most desirable for the facilities complete in place.

The resolution shall describe the project in general terms.

The resolution shall state:

What part or portion of the expense thereof is of special benefit, and, therefore, shall be paid by assessments;

What part, if any, has been or is proposed to be defrayed with moneys derived from other than the levy of assessments; and

The basis by which the cost will be apportioned and assessments will be levied.

In case the assessment is not to be made according to front feet, the resolution shall:

By apt description designate the improvement district, including the tracts to be assessed;

Describe definitely the location of the project; and

State that the assessment is to be made upon all the tracts benefited by the project proportionately to the benefits received.

In case the assessment is to be upon the abutting property upon a frontage basis, it shall be sufficient for the resolution so to state and to define the location of the project to be made.

It shall not be necessary in any case to describe minutely in the resolution each particular tract to be assessed but simply to designate the property, improvement district, or the location so that the various parts to be assessed can be ascertained and determined to be within or without the proposed improvement district.

The engineer shall forthwith prepare and file with the secretary:

The preliminary plans;

The preliminary estimate of cost; and

The assessment plat.

Upon the filing of the plans, preliminary estimate of cost, and plat, the board shall examine the same; and if the plans, estimate, and plat are found to be satisfactory, the board shall make a provisional order by resolution to the effect that the project shall be acquired or improved, or both acquired and improved.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 785, § 116.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-116.

32-11-604. Petition method.

Whenever the owner or owners of tracts to be assessed in the proposed improvement district for not less than ninety-five percent of the entire cost of any project, including all incidental expenses, comprising more than fifty percent of the area of such territory and also comprising a majority of the landowners residing in the territory, may by written petition initiate the acquisition of any assessment project which the board is authorized to initiate, subject to the following limitations:

The board may incorporate such project in any improvement district or districts;

The board need not proceed with the acquisition of any such project or any part thereof after holding a provisional order hearing thereon, pursuant to sections 32-11-608 to 32-11-611, and all provisions of this article thereunto enabling, if the board determines that it is not for the public interest that the proposed project or a part thereof be then ordered to be made; and

Any particular kind of project, any material therefor, or any part thereof need not be acquired or located, as provided in the petition, if the board determines that such is not for the public interest.

The board need not take any proceedings or action upon receiving any such petition if the board determines by resolution that the acquisition of the designated project probably is not feasible for reasons stated in such resolution, and if the resolution requires a cash deposit or a pledge of property in at least an amount or value therein designated and found therein by the board probably to be sufficient to defray the expenses and costs incurred by the board taken preliminary to and in the attempted acquisition of the project designated in the petition, and if such deposit or pledge is not made with the treasurer within twenty days after notice by mail is given to the person presenting the petition to the secretary of the urban district or after one publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the urban district of a notice of the resolution's adoption and of its content in summary form, as the board may determine. An additional deposit or pledge may from time to time be similarly so required as a condition precedent to the continuation of action by the urban district.

Whenever such deposit or pledge is so made and thereafter the board determines that such acquisition is not feasible within a reasonable period of time, the board may require that all or any portion of the costs theretofore incurred in connection therewith by the urban district after its receipt of the petition shall be defrayed from such deposit or the proceeds of such pledged property, in the absence of such defrayment of costs by petitioners or other interested persons within twenty days after the determination by resolution of the amount so to be defrayed and after such published notice thereof.

Any surplus moneys remaining from such deposit or pledge shall be returned by the urban district to the person making the same.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 786, § 117.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-117.

32-11-605. Subsequent procedure.

Upon the filing of such a petition, the board shall proceed in the same manner as is provided by this article where proceedings are initiated by the board, except as otherwise expressly provided or necessarily implied in section 32-11-604.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 787, § 118.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-118.

32-11-606. Combination of programs.

More than one improvement program may be combined in one improvement district when the board determines such programs may be combined together in an efficient and an economical improvement district.

If in the combination of improvement programs, they are separate and distinct by reason of substantial difference in their character or location, or otherwise, each such program shall be considered as a unit or quasi-improvement district for the purpose of petition, remonstrance, and assessment.

In case of such combination, the board shall designate the improvement program and the area constituting each such unit, and, in the absence of an arbitrary and an unreasonable abuse of discretion, its determination that there is or is not such a combination and its determination of the project and the area constituting each such unit within the project shall be final and conclusive.

The costs of acquiring or improving, or acquiring and improving, each such improvement program shall be segregated for the levy of assessments, and an equitable share of the incidental costs shall be allocated to each such unit.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 787, § 119.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-119.

32-11-607. Effect of estimates.

No estimate of cost required or authorized in this article shall constitute a limitation upon such cost or a limitation upon the rights and powers of the board or of any officers, agents, or employees of the urban district, except as otherwise expressly stated in this article.

No assessment, however, shall exceed the amount of the estimate of maximum special benefits from the project to any tract assessed.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 787, § 120.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-120.

32-11-608. Fixing hearing and notice.

In the provisional order the board shall set a time at least twenty days thereafter and a place at which the owners of the tracts to be assessed or any other persons interested therein may appear before the board and be heard as to the propriety and advisability of acquiring or improving, or acquiring and improving, the assessment project provisionally ordered.

Notice shall be given:

By publication; and

By mail.

Proof of publication shall be by affidavit of the publisher.

Proof of mailing shall be by affidavit of the engineer, secretary, or any deputy mailing the notice.

Proof of publication and proof of mailing shall be maintained in the records of the urban district until all the assessments pertaining thereto have been paid in full, including principal, interest, any penalties, and any collection costs.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 788, § 121.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-121.

32-11-609. Content of notice.

The notice shall describe:

The kind of project proposed (without mentioning minor details or incidentals);

The estimated cost of the project, and the part or portion, if any, to be paid from sources other than assessments;

The basis for apportioning the assessments, which assessment shall be in proportion to the special benefits derived to each of the several tracts comprising the assessable property and on a front-foot, area, zone, or other equitable basis;

The number of installments and the time in which the assessments are payable;

The maximum rate of interest on unpaid installments of assessments;

The extent of the improvement district to be assessed (by boundaries or other brief description);

The time and the place when and where the board will consider the ordering of the proposed project and will hear all complaints, protests, and objections that may be made in writing and filed with the secretary of the urban district at least three days prior thereto or may be made verbally at the hearing concerning the same by the owner of any tract to be assessed or by any person interested;

The fact that the description of the tracts to be assessed, the maximum amount of benefits estimated to be conferred on each such tract, and all proceedings in the premises are on file and can be seen and examined at the office of the secretary during business hours at any time by any person so interested; and

That regardless of the basis used for apportioning assessments, in cases of wedge-shaped, V-shaped, or any other irregular-shaped tracts, an amount apportioned thereto shall be in proportion to the special benefits thereby derived.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 788, § 122.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-122.

32-11-610. Subsequent modifications.

All proceedings may be modified or rescinded wholly or in part by resolution adopted by the board at any time prior to the passage of the resolution adopted pursuant to section 32-11-614 creating the improvement district and authorizing the project.

No substantial change in the improvement district, details, preliminary plans, specifications, or estimates shall be made after the first publication or mailing of notice to property owners, whichever occurs first, except for any deletion of a portion of a project and property from the proposed improvement program for the improvement district or for any assessment unit.

The engineer, however, has the right to make minor changes in time, plans, and materials entering into the work at any time before its completion.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 789, § 123.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-123.

32-11-611. Provisional order hearing.

On the date and at the place fixed for the provisional order hearing, any property owners interested in such project may by specific and written complaints, protests, or objections present their views in respect to the proposed project to the board or may present them orally. The board may adjourn the hearing from time to time.

After the hearing has been concluded, after all written complaints, protests, and objections have been read and duly considered, and after all persons desiring to be heard in person have been heard, the board shall consider the arguments, if any, and any other relevant material put forth.

Thereafter if the board determines that it is not for the public interest that the proposed project or a part thereof be made, the board shall make an order by resolution to that effect; and thereupon the proceeding for the project or for any part thereof determined against by such order shall stop and shall not be begun again until the adoption of a new resolution.

Any complaint, protest, or objection to the regularity, validity, and correctness of the proceedings and instruments taken, adopted, or made prior to the date of the hearing shall be deemed waived unless presented in writing on specific grounds at the time and in the manner specified in this article.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 789, § 124.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-124.

32-11-612. Appeal from adverse order.

Any person filing a written complaint, protest, or objection on any one or more specific grounds as provided in section 32-11-611, shall have the right within thirty days after the board has finally passed on such complaint, protest, or objection by resolution, as provided in section 32-11-611 (3), or as provided in section 32-11-614 (1), to commence an action or suit in any court of competent jurisdiction to correct or to set aside only such a determination of the board on any such specific and written complaint, protest, or objection; but thereafter all actions or suits attacking the validity of the preliminary plans, any preliminary estimate of cost, assessment plat, other proceedings, and any maximum amount of benefits shall be perpetually barred.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 789, § 125.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-125.

32-11-613. Post-hearing procedure.

After the provisional order hearing is held and after the board has disposed of all complaints, protests, and objections, verbal and in writing, the board shall determine whether to proceed with the improvement district and with each assessment unit therein, if there is more than one.

If the board desires to proceed and desires any modification, by motion or by resolution, it shall direct the engineer to prepare and to present to the board:

A revised and detailed estimate of the total cost, including without limitation the cost of acquiring or improving, or acquiring and improving, each proposed improvement program and of each of the incidental costs, which revised estimate shall not constitute a limitation for any purpose, except as otherwise provided in this article;

Full and detailed plans and specifications for each proposed improvement program designed to permit and to encourage competition among the bidders if any improvements are to be acquired by construction contract; and

A revised map and assessment plat showing, respectively, the location of each improvement program and the tracts to be assessed therefor, excluding any area or program not before the board at a provisional order hearing.

That resolution, a separate resolution, or the resolution creating the improvement district may combine or may divide the proposed improvement program or programs pertaining to the improvement district and any other facilities into suitable construction units for the purpose of letting separate and independent contracts, regardless of the extent of any improvement program constituting an assessment unit and regardless of whether a portion or none of the cost of any project is to be defrayed other than by the levy of special assessments.

Nothing in this article shall be construed as not requiring the segregation of costs of unrelated improvement programs for assessment purposes, as provided in this article.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 789, § 126.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-126.

32-11-614. Creation of district.

When an accurate estimate of cost, full and detailed plans and specifications, and the map and assessment plat are prepared, presented, and satisfactory to the board, regardless of whether the preliminary estimate of cost, plans, and specifications, map and assessment plat are modified pursuant to section 32-11-613, the board shall by resolution create the district and order the proposed project to be acquired or improved, or acquired and improved.

The resolution shall prescribe:

The extent of the improvement district by boundaries or by other brief description and similarly of each assessment unit therein, if there is more than one;

The kind and location of each improvement program proposed (without mentioning minor details);

The amount or the proportion of the total cost to be defrayed by assessments, the method of levying assessments, the number of installments, and the times in which the costs assessed will be payable; and

The character and the extent of any construction units.

The engineer may further revise such cost, plans and specifications, and the map and assessment plat from time to time for all or any part of any project; and the resolution may be appropriately amended prior to letting any construction contract therefor and prior to any property being acquired or any work being done other than by independent contract let by the urban district.

The resolution, as amended, if amended, shall order the work to be done as provided in this article.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 790, § 127.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-127.

32-11-615. Methods of acquisition or improvement.

Any construction work for any project or portion thereof shall be done in any one or more of the following three ways:

By independent contract;

By use of district owned or leased equipment and district officers, agents, and employees; or

By any public body or by the federal government acquiring or improving a project or any interest therein which is authorized in this article which results in general benefits to the urban district and in special benefits to the assessable property being assessed therefor by the urban district within its boundaries and within an improvement district therein created therefor.

Any project or any interest therein not involving construction work pertaining to a capital improvement may be acquired or improved pursuant to any appropriate contract, or otherwise, including, without limitation, the condemnation or other acquisition of real property. In such case nothing in subsection (1) of this section nor in sections 32-11-616 to 32-11-619 shall be applicable.

Notwithstanding a project authorized in this article or any interest therein may not be owned by the urban district nor be directly acquired or improved, or acquired and improved, nor the costs thereof directly incurred by the urban district, and notwithstanding the project authorized in this article or any interest therein may be located on land, an easement or other interest therein, or other real property owned by the federal government or by a public body, the urban district has the power:

To acquire or improve, or both, or to cooperate in the acquisition or improvement of, or both, the project or any interest therein with the federal government or with any public body pursuant to agreement between or among the urban district and such other bodies corporate and politic so long as the project or the interest therein acquired or improved, or both, results in general benefits to the urban district and in special benefits to the assessable property being assessed therefor by the urban district within its boundaries and within the improvement district therein created therefor;

To levy special assessments on such assessable property to defray all or any part of the costs of the project or any interest therein or to defray all or any part of the urban district's share of such costs if all costs are not being defrayed by the urban district; and

To issue bonds and assessment debentures and to exercise other powers granted in this article and pertaining to such acquisition or improvement, or both.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 791, § 128.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-128.

32-11-616. Construction contracts.

No contract for doing construction work for acquiring or improving the project contemplated shall be made or awarded nor shall the board incur any expense or any liability in relation thereto, except for maps, plats, diagrams, estimates, plans, specifications, and notices until after the provisional order hearing and notice thereof provided for in this article have been had and given.

The board may advertise by publication for proposals for doing the work whenever the board desires, but the contract shall not be made or awarded before the time stated in subsection (1) of this section.

In the case of construction work done by independent contract for any project or portion thereof in any improvement district, the engineer or any purchasing officer of the urban district, as provided by the board, shall request competitive bids and publish notice stating that bids will be received at a time and at a place designated therein.

The urban district may contract only with the responsible bidder submitting the lowest and best bid upon proper terms.

The district has the right to reject any and all bids and to waive any irregularity in any bid.

Any contract may be let on a lump-sum or on a unit basis.

No contract shall be entered into for such work unless the contractor gives an undertaking with a sufficient surety approved by the board and in an amount fixed by it for the faithful performance of the contract, substantially as required of a school board and a school district by sections 38-26-101 and 38-26-105 to 38-26-107, C.R.S., as from time to time amended, except as expressly otherwise provided in this article.

Upon default in the performance of any contract, the engineer, or any purchasing officer, as directed by motion of the board, may advertise and may relet the remainder of the work without further resolution and may deduct the cost from the original contract price and may recover any excess cost by suit on the original bond, or otherwise.

All contracts shall provide, among other things, that the person entering into the contract with the urban district will pay for all materials furnished and for services rendered for the performance of the contract and that any person furnishing the materials or rendering the services may maintain an action to recover for the same against the obligor in the undertaking as though the person was named therein. Final settlement shall be effected substantially as required by section 38-26-107, C.R.S., as from time to time amended, and all laws thereunto enabling.

If any contract or any agreement is made in violation of the provisions of this section, it shall be voidable, and no action shall be maintained thereon by any party thereto against the urban district.

To the extent the urban district makes any payment thereunder, such contract or agreement shall be valid, and any such payment may be included in any cost defrayed by the levy of assessments unless theretofore the urban district elects to void the contract or the agreement in its entirety and to recover any such payment from the party to whom made.

The board, except as expressly limited in this article, may in the letting of contracts impose such conditions upon bidders with regard to bonds and to securities, and such guaranties of good and faithful performance, completion of any work, and the keeping of the same in repair, and may provide for any further matter or thing in connection therewith as may be considered by the board to be advantageous to the urban district and to all interested persons.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 791, § 129.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-129.

L. 77:

(7) and (9) amended, p. 288, § 65, effective June 29.

32-11-617. Extra work authorized - payment.

Extra work may arise in connection with any project mentioned in this article and not particularly provided for in the plans, specifications, estimates, bids and contracts; and such extra work shall be performed by the contractor at the direction of the engineer at cost of labor and materials and overhead including superintendence as set forth in the plans, specifications, or construction contract, such amount to be included in the assessment for the project (but not exceeding in the aggregate the estimated maximum special benefits to any tract so assessed) or to be paid out of the general or other funds of the district available therefor, in the discretion of the board.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 793, § 130.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-130.

32-11-618. Construction by district.

In the case of construction work done by the use of district owned or leased equipment and by district officers, agents, and employees for any project or any portion thereof in any improvement district, supplies and materials may be purchased or may be otherwise acquired therefor.

All supplies and materials purchased by the urban district for an improvement district costing five hundred dollars or more shall be purchased only after the purchasing officer has given notice by publication therefor.

The district shall accept the lowest and best bid, the kind, quality, and material being equal, but the district has the right to reject all bids, to waive any irregularity in any bid, and to select a single item from any bid when so stated in the invitation to bid.

The provision as to bidding shall not apply to the purchase of patented and manufactured products offered for sale in a noncompetitive market or solely by a manufacturer's authorized dealer.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 793, § 131.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-131.

32-11-619. Cooperative construction.

In the case of construction work done by agreement with the urban district and with one or more public bodies or with the federal government (or any combination thereof) for any project or any portion thereof in any improvement district, the urban district may enter into and carry out any contract or may establish or comply with the rules and regulations concerning labor and materials and other related matters in connection with any project or any portion thereof, as the district may deem desirable or as may be requested by the federal government or by any public body which is a party to any such contract with the district that may assist in the financing of any project or any part thereof, regardless of whether the district is a party to any construction contract or to any other contract pertaining to incurring costs of the project.

Any project, any portion of the cost of which may be defrayed by the urban district by the levy of assessments under this article, may be acquired with the cooperation and the assistance of, or under a contract let by, or with labor, or supplies and materials, or all of such furnished by any one or more such public bodies or by the federal government (or any combination thereof).

Advantage may be taken of any offer from any source to complete any project on a division of expense or responsibility.

The engineer, on behalf of and in the name of the urban district, is authorized to acquire or improve, or acquire and improve, any such project in such a manner when so authorized by the resolution creating the improvement district or by any amendment thereto.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 793, § 132.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-132.

32-11-620. Use of existing improvements.

After the provisional order hearing and at the time of the passage of the resolution creating any improvement district and any project for the improvement district, or any amendment thereof, if any tract or the property of any railway company to be assessed in the improvement district has the whole or any part of the proposed project, conforming to the general plan, the same may be adopted in whole or in part or may be changed to conform to the general plan, if deemed practical; and the owner of such real estate, when the assessment is made, shall be credited with the amount which is saved by reason of adapting or of adopting such existing improvements.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 793, § 133.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-133.

32-11-621. Assessment debentures.

For the purpose of paying any contractor of or otherwise defraying any cost of the project in connection with any improvement district as the same becomes due from time to time until moneys are available therefor from the levy and collection of assessments and from any issuance of assessment bonds, the board may issue assessment debentures on the behalf and in the name of the urban district as provided in sections 32-11-501 (3) and 32-11-502 to 32-11-526 and elsewhere in this article, except as otherwise provided in sections 32-11-621 to 32-11-631.

Any assessment debentures issued for any construction work shall be issued only upon estimates of the engineer.

Any assessment debentures shall be special obligations payable from designated special assessments, any proceeds of special assessment bonds, and any other moneys designated to be available for the redemption of such debentures and authorized in this article to be pledged as additional security for the payment of such bonds.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 794, § 134.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-134.

32-11-622. Issuance of assessment securities.

The board has power in connection with any improvement district to issue, on the behalf and in the name of the urban district, bonds in an amount not exceeding the estimated cost of the project or part thereof to be defrayed by the levy and collection of assessments, or if the bonds are issued after the levy of assessments, in an aggregate principal amount not exceeding the aggregate amount of unpaid assessments pledged for the payment of the bonds as provided in sections 32-11-501 (3) and 32-11-502 to 32-11-526 and elsewhere in this article, except as otherwise provided in sections 32-11-622 to 32-11-631.

Any assessment bonds may be issued at public or private sale to defray the cost of the project, including any temporary advances evidenced by assessment debentures or otherwise and all proper incidental expenses.

The board may enter into a contract to sell assessment debentures and assessment bonds at any time; but, any other provisions of this article notwithstanding, if the board so contracts before it awards a construction contract or otherwise contracts for acquiring or improving, or acquiring and improving, the project, the board may terminate the contract to sell such securities if, before the awarding of the construction contract or otherwise contracting for the acquisition or improvement, or acquisition and improvement, of the project, the board determines not to acquire or improve, or acquire and improve, the project, and if the board has not elected to proceed under section 32-11-615 other than by independent contract pursuant to section 32-11-615 (1)(a), if at all.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 794, § 135.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-135.

32-11-623. Purchase price and interest.

Any district securities designated in section 32-11-501 (3) and otherwise issued under this article, both assessment bonds and assessment debentures, as may be provided by the board in a resolution authorizing their issuance and the maximum net effective interest rate thereof and in any indenture or other proceedings pertaining thereto, may be issued at, above, or below par, at a discount not exceeding seven percent of the principal amount thereof, but they may not be issued at a price such that the net effective interest rate of the issue of securities exceeds the maximum net effective interest rate authorized.

Such bonds and debentures shall bear interest at a rate such that the net effective interest rate of the issue of bonds or debentures does not exceed the maximum net effective interest rate authorized.

No bond interest rate shall at any time exceed the interest rate (or lower or lowest rate if more than one) borne by the unpaid assessments, but any such bond interest rate may be the same as or less than any assessment interest rate, subject to the limitations of this section, as the board may determine.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 794, § 136.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-136.

L. 70:

p. 302, § 129.

32-11-624. Use of assessments - payment of assessment securities.

The assessments pertaining to any improvement district when levied shall be and shall remain a lien on the respective tracts assessed until paid as provided in this article.

When the assessments pertaining to the improvement district are collected (including principal, interest, and any penalty), they shall be placed in a special fund or special account and as such shall at all times constitute a sinking fund or sinking account for and be deemed specially appropriated to the payment of any assessment debentures not funded with bond proceeds and the payment of the assessment bonds pertaining to the improvement district and the interest thereon, and shall not be used for any other purpose until such securities and the interest thereon are fully paid; or if no such securities are issued, all assessments upon their payment shall be so appropriated and used to defray the cost of the project.

Any assessment debentures not funded with bond proceeds and the assessment bonds, including both principal and interest, shall be payable only out of moneys collected on account of the assessments (including installments thereof, interest thereon, and any penalties) for the project pertaining to the improvement district to which such securities pertain, except as provided in this article.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 795, § 137.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-137.

32-11-625. Bond limitations and details.

All assessment bonds issued under this article shall be issued by the treasurer upon estimates of the engineer, or if bonds are issued after the levy of assessments, in an aggregate principal amount not exceeding the aggregate amount of unpaid assessments pledged for the payment of the bonds, and upon order of the board by resolution.

The bonds shall mature in no event after that date which is one year after the last assessment installment payment date.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 795, § 138.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-138.

32-11-626. Prior redemption provisions.

The board may provide for the redemption prior to maturity at the option of the district of any of the bonds or debentures designated in section 32-11-501 (3), in such order, by lot or otherwise, at such time or times, without or with the payment of such premium not exceeding seven percent of the principal amount of each bond or other security so redeemed, and otherwise upon such terms as may be provided by the board in the resolution authorizing the issuance of the securities or other instrument pertaining thereto.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 795, § 139.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-139.

32-11-627. Special obligations.

Assessment debentures and assessment bonds issued under this article shall constitute special obligations of the urban district and shall not be a debt of the district. The district shall not be liable on such securities except as otherwise expressly provided in this article, nor shall the urban district thereby pledge its full faith and credit for their payment. Such securities (other than debentures funded with bond proceeds) shall not be payable out of any funds other than the special assessments (including installments thereof, interest thereon, and any penalties) and other funds and moneys pledged as additional security for the payment thereof, as authorized in this article.

Each assessment debenture and assessment bond issued under this article shall recite in substance that the bond and the interest thereon are payable solely from the special assessments and such other funds and moneys pledged to the payment thereof.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 796, § 140.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-140.

32-11-628. Primary additional security.

The urban district shall additionally secure the payment of the assessment debentures and the assessment bonds pertaining to any improvement district as provided in this article.

Whenever there is a deficiency in any improvement district to meet payment of such outstanding assessment securities and interest due thereon, it shall be paid out of the urban district's special surplus and deficiency fund.

The urban district shall pay the assessment securities pertaining to any improvement district when due and the interest due thereon from any available moneys of the urban district and reimburse itself by collecting the unpaid assessments due the improvement district, whenever:

Four-fifths of the outstanding bonds pertaining to the improvement district have been paid; and

For any reason the remaining assessments pertaining to the improvement district are not paid in time to take up the final bonds of the improvement district and the interest due thereon; and

There is not sufficient money in the special surplus and deficiency fund.

When all outstanding assessment securities pertaining to an improvement district have been paid and any moneys remain to the credit of such district, they shall be transferred to the special surplus and deficiency fund.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 796, § 141.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 89-21-141.